New York, session 2025-2026, A7287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the town law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 37 to read as follows: 3 37. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 in the town of Harrison, in the county of Westchester, the person 5 performing the function of assistant court clerk or fire marshal, need 6 not be an elector of such town. Provided, however, the person perform- 7 ing the function of assistant court clerk or fire marshal in any other 8 town shall be an elector of such town, unless otherwise provided by an 9 act of the state legislature. 10 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 11 subdivision 76 to read as follows: 12 76. In the town of Harrison, in the county of Westchester, the 13 provisions of this section requiring a person to be a resident of the 14 political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state for which 15 such person shall be chosen or within which such person's official func- 16 tions are required to be exercised, shall not prevent a person from 17 holding the office of assistant court clerk or fire marshal of the town 18 of Harrison; provided that such person resides in a town which is in the 19 county of Westchester. Provided, however, the person performing the 20 function of assistant court clerk or fire marshal in any other town 21 shall be a resident of such town, unless otherwise provided by law. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10317-02-5